District of Columbia statutes.
7-1141.08

Continuation of rules and regulations.

All rulemaking and regulations for the administration of the District’s public mental health system and the addiction, recovery, and prevention system, issued under appropriate authority, shall continue in full force and effect until otherwise superseded.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5119, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5119 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 5119 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 5111 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle J of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Department of Behavioral Health Establishment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.